Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1580
Discovery of property of debtor; proceedings; county judge; fees.

The county judge shall be allowed for his or her services, under sections 25-1564 to 25-1580, the sum of five dollars in each case, and such fees as are allowed by law to clerks of the district court for similar services.

R.S.1867, Code § 549, p. 490;

R.S.1913, § 8128;

C.S.1922, § 9064;

C.S.1929, § 20-1582;

R.S.1943, § 25-1580;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 19.